src-fst-morphology-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
* LEXICON N_VUYRR  vuârr:vuârr
N_1A_VWCC
Sg_Nom: vow_di:vow_short:vow_low:pal_no:cns_gem
Is for nouns with *-ast* Loc
## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
## 1.2 Sg.Loc in -ast (vowel shift)
Raised: Sg.Ill
Lowered: ELSE
a-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.2.2 Sg.Ill vowel	-u
## 1.2.2.2 Lacks Palatalization
## 1.2.2.2.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.2.2.2.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.2.2.2.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate alternation)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
uâ:uõ, eä:iâ
## FORMS
N_A-URaise3-32
* Yaml: **N-vuarr**
grade: neutral (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
Sg_Nom, Sg_Nom..., Sg_Abe_Px1, Sg_Acc_Px1, Sg_Gen_Px1, Pl_Nom_Px1

grade: weakened (long_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
Sg_Abe, Sg_Acc, Sg_Gen, Pl_Nom, +Use/NG_Sg_Loc_Px..., 
stem_vowel: a : Sg_Loc, Sg_Com, Pl_Gen, Pl_Acc, Pl_Ill, Pl_Loc, Pl_Com, Pl_Abe

grade: strengthened (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: raised
Sg_Ill

grade: strengthened (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
* : A-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;            (5) vuârr
Ess_Px..., Sg_Ill..., N»A

grade: neutral (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low), stem_vowel: a

grade: weakened (long_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: raised, stem_vowel: u/a
* +Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^CC2C%> N_PEESSAZH ;   (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: vuâraž

grade: allegro (short_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
* :%^YXX2VX SG-LOC-PX_ALLEGRO ;  (10) vuâr»
Sg_Loc_Px..

grade: neutral (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low), stem_vowel: a

* LEXICON N_TUYJJ  tuâjj:tuâjj
N_1A_VWCC
Sg_Nom: vow_di:vow_short:vow_low:pal_no:cns_gem_jj_type
Is for nouns with *-ast* Loc
## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
## 1.2 Sg.Loc in -ast (vowel shift)
Raised: Sg.Ill
Lowered: ELSE
a-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.2.2 Sg.Ill vowel	-u
## 1.2.2.0 Lacks Palatalization
## 1.2.2.0.2 Has Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.2.2.0.2.0 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.2.2.0.2.0[] (Diphthong + Consonant Geminate alternation)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
similar_to: N_KHIOJJ
## FORMS
N_A-URaise3-32
* Yaml: **N-tuajj**
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^PALẸ SG-NOM ;  tuẹjj
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^PALẸ%^CC2C SG-GEN ;		 (2) tuẹj
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^J2I%^CC2C SG-GEN ;		 (2) tuâi

* LEXICON N_TUEJJ  tuejj:tuâjj
N_1A_VWCC
this is based on the stem tuâjj, which means all twol work is in place.
there has been an â>e
N_A-URaise3-32
* Yaml: **N-tuejj**
* :%^PALẸ A-STEM_SG-NOM ;  tuẹjj
* :%^PALẸ%^CC2C A-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;		 (2) tuẹj
* +Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^PALẸ%^CC2C%> N_PEESSAZH ;   (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: tuejaž
* :%^PALẸ%^CC2C SG-LOC-PX_ALLEGRO ;  (10) tuej»

* LEXICON N_1A_VWKK  juâkk:juâkk
N_1A_VWKK
Sg_Nom: vow_di:vow_short:vow_low:pal_no:cns_gem
## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
## 1.2 Sg.Loc in -ast (vowel shift)
Raised: Sg.Ill
Lowered: ELSE
a-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.2.2 Sg.Ill vowel	-u
## 1.2.2.2 Lacks Palatalization
## 1.2.2.2.2 Has Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.2.2.2.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.2.2.2.1.1[] (Diphthong + Consonant Geminate alternation)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
N_A-URaise3-32
* Yaml: **N-chuacc**
grade: neutral (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
* : A-STEM_SG-NOM ;				 (1) Sg.Nom: čuäcc
Sg_Nom, Sg_Nom..., Sg_Abe_Px1, Sg_Acc_Px1, Sg_Gen_Px1, Pl_Nom_Px1

grade: weakened (long_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
* :%^KK2GG A-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;	 (2) Pl.Nom: čuäʒʒ
Sg_Abe, Sg_Acc, Sg_Gen, Pl_Nom, +Use/NG_Sg_Loc_Px..., 
stem_vowel: a : Sg_Loc, Sg_Com, Pl_Gen, Pl_Acc, Pl_Ill, Pl_Loc, Pl_Com, Pl_Abe

grade: strengthened (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: raised
* :%^VOWRaise%^CC2CCC%>u SG-ILL ;		 (3) Sg.Ill: čuåcˈcu
Sg_Ill

grade: strengthened (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
* : A-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;            (5) čuäcc
Ess_Px..., Sg_Ill..., N»A

grade: neutral (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low), stem_vowel: a
* :%>a ESS/PAR ;  	      			 (6) Ess: čuäccan

grade: weakened (long_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: raised, stem_vowel: u/a
* +Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^VOWRaise%^KK2GG%> N_PIISSUZH ;     (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: čuåʒʒuž
* +Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^KK2GG%> N_PEESSAZH ;   (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: čuäʒʒaž

grade: allegro (short_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
* :%^KK2GAllegro SG-LOC-PX_ALLEGRO ;  (10) čuäʒ»
Sg_Loc_Px..

* LEXICON N_CHUAECC  čuäcc:čuäcc
N_1A_VWKK
Sg_Nom: vow_di:vow_short:vow_low:pal_no:cns_gem
## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
## 1.2 Sg.Loc in -ast (vowel shift)
Raised: Sg.Ill
Lowered: ELSE
a-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.2.2 Sg.Ill vowel	-u
## 1.2.2.2 Lacks Palatalization
## 1.2.2.2.2 Has Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.2.2.2.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.2.2.2.1.1[] (Diphthong + Consonant Geminate alternation)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
N_A-URaise3-32
* Yaml: **N-chuacc**
grade: neutral (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
* : A-STEM_SG-NOM ;				 (1) Sg.Nom: čuäcc
Sg_Nom, Sg_Nom..., Sg_Abe_Px1, Sg_Acc_Px1, Sg_Gen_Px1, Pl_Nom_Px1

grade: weakened (long_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
* :%^KK2GG A-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;	 (2) Pl.Nom: čuäʒʒ
Sg_Abe, Sg_Acc, Sg_Gen, Pl_Nom, +Use/NG_Sg_Loc_Px..., 
stem_vowel: a : Sg_Loc, Sg_Com, Pl_Gen, Pl_Acc, Pl_Ill, Pl_Loc, Pl_Com, Pl_Abe

grade: strengthened (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: raised
* :%^VOWRaise%^CC2CCC%>u SG-ILL ;		 (3) Sg.Ill: čuåcˈcu
Sg_Ill

grade: strengthened (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
* : A-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;            (5) čuäcc
Ess_Px..., Sg_Ill..., N»A

grade: neutral (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low), stem_vowel: a
* :%>a ESS/PAR ;  	      			 (6) Ess: čuäccan

grade: weakened (long_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: raised, stem_vowel: u/a
* +Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^VOWRaise%^KK2GG%> N_PIISSUZH ;     (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: čuåʒʒuž
* +Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^KK2GG%> N_PEESSAZH ;   (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: čuäʒʒaž

grade: allegro (short_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
* :%^KK2GAllegro SG-LOC-PX_ALLEGRO ;  (10) čuäʒ»
Sg_Loc_Px..

* Yaml: **N-chuacc**
grade: neutral (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
Sg_Nom, Sg_Nom..., Sg_Abe_Px1, Sg_Acc_Px1, Sg_Gen_Px1, Pl_Nom_Px1

grade: weakened (long_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
* :%^KK2GG A-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;	 (2) Pl.Nom: čuäʒʒ
Sg_Abe, Sg_Acc, Sg_Gen, Pl_Nom, +Use/NG_Sg_Loc_Px..., 
stem_vowel: a : Sg_Loc, Sg_Com, Pl_Gen, Pl_Acc, Pl_Ill, Pl_Loc, Pl_Com, Pl_Abe

grade: strengthened (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
* : A-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;            (5) čuäcc
Ess_Px..., Sg_Ill..., N»A

grade: neutral (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low), stem_vowel: a
* :%>a ESS/PAR ;  	      			 (6) Ess: čuäccan

* LEXICON N_NEAVVV  neävv:neävˈv
N_1A_VWCCC
Sg_Nom: vow_di:vow_short:vow_low:pal_no:cns_gem_long
Is for nouns with *-ast* Loc
## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
## 1.2 Sg.Loc in -ast (vowel shift)
Raised: Sg.Ill
Lowered: ELSE
a-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.2.2 Sg.Ill vowel	-u
## 1.2.2.0 Lacks Palatalization
## 1.2.2.0.2 Has Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.2.2.0.2.0 Lack Orthographic Gradation
## 1.2.2.0.2.0[] (Diphthong + Consonant Geminate alternation)
Extra strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
Strong grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
* Yaml: **N-neavvv**
* : A-STEM_SG-NOM ;	    			  neävˈv
Sg_Nom, Sg_Nom..., Sg_Abe_Px1, Sg_Acc_Px1, Sg_Gen_Px1, Pl_Nom_Px1

* :%^CCC2CC A-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;	  neävv
Sg_Abe, Sg_Acc, Sg_Gen, Pl_Nom, +Use/NG_Sg_Loc_Px..., 
stem_vowel: a : Sg_Loc, Sg_Com, Pl_Gen, Pl_Acc, Pl_Ill, Pl_Loc, Pl_Com, Pl_Abe

* :%^VOWRaise%>u SG-ILL ;			  niâvˈvu
Sg_Ill

* : A-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;            (5) neävˈv
Ess_Px..., Sg_Ill..., N»A

* :%>a ESS/PAR ;   	       			 neävˈvan

* +Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^VOWRaise%^CCC2CC%> N_PIISSUZH ;   niâvvuž
* +Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^CCC2CC%> N_PEESSAZH ;   (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: neävvaž

* :%^CCC2CC SG-LOC-PX_ALLEGRO ;  (10) neävv» CHECKME
Sg_Loc_Px..

* +Cmp/SgNom: R ;                     neävˈv
* :%^CCC2CC PL-NOM ;         neävv
* :%^CCC2CC%>a PL-OBL ;                    neävvai

N_1A_VWCCC cf. _NEAVVV
* Yaml: **N-peyttt**
* : A-STEM_SG-NOM ;	    			  Peâtˈt
Sg_Nom, Sg_Nom..., Sg_Abe_Px1, Sg_Acc_Px1, Sg_Gen_Px1, Pl_Nom_Px1

* :%^CCC2CC A-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;	  Peâtt
Sg_Abe, Sg_Acc, Sg_Gen, Pl_Nom, +Use/NG_Sg_Loc_Px..., 
stem_vowel: a : Sg_Loc, Sg_Com, Pl_Gen, Pl_Acc, Pl_Ill, Pl_Loc, Pl_Com, Pl_Abe

* :%^VOWRaise%>u SG-ILL ;			  piõtˈtu
Sg_Ill

* : A-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;            (5) Peâtˈt
Ess_Px..., Sg_Ill..., N»A

* :%>a ESS/PAR ;   	       			 Peâtˈtan

* +Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^VOWRaise%^CCC2CC%> N_PIISSUZH ;   niâvvuž
* +Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^CCC2CC%> N_PEESSAZH ;   (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: neävvaž

* :%^CCC2CC SG-LOC-PX_ALLEGRO ;  (10) neävv» CHECKME
Sg_Loc_Px..

* LEXICON N_1A_VWYXX  peäldd:peäldd
N_1A_VWYXX
Sg_Nom: vow_di:vow_short:vow_low:pal_no:cns_xyy
Is for nouns with *-ast* Loc
## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
## 1.2 Sg.Loc in -ast (vowel shift)
Raised: Sg.Ill
Lowered: ELSE
a-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.2.2 Sg.Ill vowel	-u
## 1.2.2.0 Lacks Palatalization
## 1.2.2.0.2 Has Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.2.2.0.2.0 Lack Orthographic Gradation
## 1.2.2.0.2.0[] (Diphthong + Consonant Geminate alternation)
Extra strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
Strong grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
## (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: piâlduž (2009: 310)
N_A-URaise3-32
similar_to: N_JEAQRMM
* Yaml: **N-pealdd**
* : A-STEM_SG-NOM ;	    		  peäldd
Sg_Nom, Sg_Nom..., Sg_Abe_Px1, Sg_Acc_Px1, Sg_Gen_Px1, Pl_Nom_Px1

* :%^YXX2YX A-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;	  peäld
Sg_Abe, Sg_Acc, Sg_Gen, Pl_Nom, +Use/NG_Sg_Loc_Px..., 
stem_vowel: a : Sg_Loc, Sg_Com, Pl_Gen, Pl_Acc, Pl_Ill, Pl_Loc, Pl_Com, Pl_Abe

* :%^VOWRaise%>u SG-ILL ;		  piâlddu
Sg_Ill

* : A-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;            (5) peäldd
Ess_Px..., Sg_Ill..., N»A

* :%>a ESS/PAR ;   	       		  peälddan

* +Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^VOWRaise%^YXX2YX%> N_PIISSUZH ;    piâlduž
* +Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^YXX2YX%> N_PEESSAZH ;   (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: peäldaž

* :%^YXX2YX SG-LOC-PX_ALLEGRO ;  (10) peäld»
Sg_Loc_Px..

* +Cmp/SgNom: R ;   peäldd
* :%^YXX2YX PL-NOM ;	  peäld

* :%>a ESS/PAR ;     peälddan

* LEXICON N_TUOAIMM  tuåimm:tuåimm
N_1A_VWUCC
Sg_Nom: vow_di:vow_short:vow_low:pal_no:cns_vyy
## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
## 1.2 Sg.Loc in -ast (vowel shift)
Raised: Sg.Ill
Lowered: ELSE
a-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.2.2 Sg.Ill vowel -u
## 1.2.2.2 Lacks Palatalization
## 1.2.2.2.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.2.2.2.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.2.2.2.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Cluster alternation)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
* Yaml: **N-tuaimm**
grade: strengthened (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: not-raised
* :%^VOWRaise%>u SG-ILL ;		      	 (3) tuoimmu
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>u SG-ILL ;   tuåimmu
Sg_Ill

grade: strengthened (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
* : A-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;	    	   (5) tuåimm
Ess_Px..., Sg_Ill..., N»A

grade: neutral (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
* : A-STEM_SG-NOM ;	    			 (1) tuåimm
Sg_Nom, Sg_Nom..., Sg_Abe_Px1, Sg_Acc_Px1, Sg_Gen_Px1, Pl_Nom_Px1

grade: neutral (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low), stem_vowel: a
* :%>a ESS/PAR ;	   		    	 (6) tuåimman
